Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-3515
Practice of geology, defined.

(1)(a) Practice of geology means any service or creative work:

(i) If the adequate performance of the service or work requires geologic education, training, and experience, including consultation, investigation, planning, surveying, mapping, and inspection of geologic work, and the responsible supervision of such work; and

(ii) That relates to public welfare or the safeguarding of life, health, property, and the environment.

(b) Practice of geology includes teaching, including research and service, of any advanced geologic subject.

(2) A person shall be construed to practice or offer to practice geology if such person:

(a) Practices any branch of the profession of geology;

(b) By verbal claim, sign, advertisement, letterhead, or card or in any other way, represents that such person is a professional geologist;

(c) Through the use of some other title, implies that such person is licensed under the Geologists Regulation Act; or

(d) Represents that such person is able to perform or does perform any geologic service or work recognized by the board as the practice of geology.

Laws 1998, LB 1161, § 63;

Laws 2025, LB38, § 14.